tests/infixes03.aff
# infixes (see manual)
# English irregluar verb

# dig dug
SFX A Y 2
SFX A i. u. i[^i]
SFX A i. a. i[^i]

# swim swam swum
SFX B Y 2
SFX B i. u. i[^i]
SFX B i. a. i[^i]


SFX C Y 2
SFX C i.. a.. i[^i][^i]
SFX C i.. u.. i[^i][^i]

SFX D N 1
SFX D a.. o.. a[^a][^a]
#SFX D a.. u.. a[^a][^a]
